Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.140

Funeral expenses.

The board shall pay from the firefighters' pension fund upon the death of any active or retired firefighter the sum of $1,000, to assist in defraying the funeral expenses of such firefighter.

[ 2024 c 169 s 1; 2007 c 218 s 54; 1961 c 255 s 7; 1955 c 382 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.